src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2025 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! # North Saami numerals
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

!! ## The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  initial lexica
                       MILJON           ; ! a noun of its own
                       UNDERDUHAT       ; ! for generator under 1000
                       JUSTDUHAT        ; ! going via 1000
                       OVERDUHAT        ; ! for generator over 1000
                       OLD              ; ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
                       num-imprecise    ;
                       num-collective   ;
                       ARABICS          ; ! for the arabic numerals
            +Use/Circ: ROMAN            ; ! for the roman numerals
 +Use/-Spell+Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES     ; ! for §34 etc.
            +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP  ; ! for ½ etc.
                       11TO99F          ;
                       21TO99           ;
                       DUHAT            ;
                       1TO9DUHAT        ;
                       O-NUPPELOHKAI    ;
                       NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
                       NUPPELOHKAI      ;

LEXICON CmpNumeral   !!≈ The **@CODE@**  lexicon is the entrance for compounds
                     !!  with numbers. Introduced to restrict such compounding
                     !!  to a subgroup of numerals only, mainly to exclude
                     !!  roman numerals, that turned out to be too problematic.
                     !!  With this change, roman numerals are only recognised
                     !!  on their own.
             num-imprecise    ;
             num-collective   ;
! +Use/Circ: ARABIC           ; !gir manglende tagger #5+Num
             UNDERDUHAT       ; ! for generator under 1000
             11TO99F          ;
             21TO99           ;
             1TO9DUHAT        ;
             O-NUPPELOHKAI    ;
             NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
             NUPPELOHKAI      ;


! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILJON   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  miljons and miljards
                     biljovdna+v1:biljovdna          OKTA     ;
                     biljovdna+v2:billijovdna        OKTA     ;
                     miljovdna+v1:miljovdna          OKTA     ;
               beallemiljovdna+v1:bealle#miljovdna   OKTA     ;
                     miljovdna+v2:millijovdna        OKTA     ;
               beallemiljovdna+v2:bealle#millijovdna OKTA     ;
        miljovdna+v1+Err/Orth+Num:million            VUOSTTAS ;
               miljovdna+Err/Orth:milliovdna         OKTA     ;
               miljovdna+Err/Orth:miljuvdna          OKTA     ;
               miljovdna+Err/Orth:milliuvdna         OKTA     ;
               miljovdna+Err/Orth:milljovdna         OKTA     ;
          miljovdna+v3+Num+Sg+Nom:miljon             K        ; !Num or N?
 miljovdna+v3+Err/Orth+Num+Sg+Nom:milljon            K        ;
    beallemiljovdna+v3+Num+Sg+Nom:bealle#miljon      K        ;
    miljovdna+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:miljun             K        ;
 miljovdna+v1+Err/Orth+Num+Sg+Gen:million            K        ;
 miljovdna+v1+Err/Orth+Num+Sg+Acc:million            K        ; !
               miljovdna+Err/Orth:millijuvdna        OKTA     ;
                 miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljovnnag         VUOSTTAS ; ! This should NOT be N, since it is the starting point of the Ordinal
                 miljovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag       VUOSTTAS ;
                 miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljonag           VUOSTTAS ;
                         miljárda:miljárºda          OKTA     ; !Num or N?
                miljárda+Err/Orth:milliárºda         OKTA     ; !
                miljárda+Err/Orth:millijárºda        OKTA     ; !
                miljárda+Err/Orth:milliarºda         OKTA     ; !
     miljárda+Num+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:milliard9          K        ; ! LIA
                 miljárddat+A+Ord:miljárddag         VUOSTTAS ;



! Overduhat, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERDUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** for the numerals over 1000.
  O-OKTAF     ;
  O-2TO9F     ;
  O-JUSTLOGIF ; ! 10000
  O-2TO9LOG   ; ! 20000, 30000, ...
  O-NUPPELOT  ; ! 11000, 12000, ...
  O-CUODI     ; ! 100000
  O-2TO9CUO   ; ! 200000, 300000, ...




! Thousands

LEXICON O-OKTAF   !!≈ * **@CODE@** All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
        okta:okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
 okta+Use/NG:akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
                   JUSTDUHAT ;
                   DUHAT     ;


LEXICON O-2TO9F   !!≈ * **@CODE@** All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-. They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.
          guokte:guokte#   JUSTDUHAT ;
          golbma:golbma#   JUSTDUHAT ;
        njeallje:njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
 njeallje+Use/NG:njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
          vihtta:vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
          guhtta:guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
           čieža:čieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
  čieža+Err/Orth:gieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
          gávcci:gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT ;
           ovcci:ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT ;

LEXICON 1TO9DUHAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                       oktaduhát:okºta             OKTADUHAT   ;
                     guokteduhát:guokºt            GUOKTEDUHAT ;
                      nubbeduhát:nubb              NUBBEDUHAT  ;
                     golbmaduhát:golbma            GOLBMADUHAT ;
                   njealljeduhát:njeallj           GUOKTEDUHAT ;
 njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:njeallja#duhát    K           ;
 njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:njeallja#duhát    K           ;
 njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:njealja#duhát     K           ;
 njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:njeallja#duháh%>a K           ;
 njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:njealja#duháh%>a  K           ;
                     vihttaduhát:vi                VIHTTADUHAT ;
                     guhttaduhát:gu                VIHTTADUHAT ;
                      čiežaduhát:či                CIEZADUHAT  ;
                      giežaduhát:gi                CIEZADUHAT  ;
                     gávcciduhát:gákºci            GAVCCIDUHAT ;
                      ovcciduhát:okºci             GAVCCIDUHAT ;



! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLOGIF   !!≈ * **@CODE@** This lexicon is for the number 10 000 only. it is separated from the rest to avoid forms like *logivihttaduhát, etc.
 logi:logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
 logi:logi# DUHAT     ;

LEXICON O-CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Hundreds of thousands
              čuođi:čuođi#                O-OKTAF    ; ! 101000
         oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          O-OKTAF    ; ! 101000
             čuohte:čuohte#               O-OKTAF    ;
             čuohti:čuohti#               O-OKTAF    ; ! 101000
